Hawaii statutes.
[§708-839.55] Unauthorized possession of
confidential personal information. (1) A person commits the offense of
unauthorized possession of confidential personal information if that person
intentionally or knowingly possesses, without authorization, any confidential
personal information of another in any form, including but not limited to mail,
physical documents, identification cards, or information stored in digital
form.

(2) It is an affirmative defense that the
person who possessed the confidential personal information of another did so
under the reasonable belief that the person in possession was authorized by law
or by the consent of the other person to possess the confidential personal
information.

(3) Unauthorized possession of confidential personal
information is a class C felony. [L 2006, c 139, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §708-839.55

Act 139, Session Laws 2006, added this section to increase
the protection of personal information by making it a class C felony to
intentionally or knowingly possess the confidential information of another
without authorization. Hawaii law enforcement has found it difficult to curb
the rise in identity theft-related crimes when identity thieves in possession
of personal information who have not yet caused a monetary loss to the victim
cannot be prosecuted for crimes other than petty misdemeanor thefts. The
legislature found that adding a law to make intentionally or knowingly
possessing the confidential information of another without authorization a
class C felony would help to deter identity theft crimes. Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 2636, Conference Committee Report No. 111-06.

Case Notes

Defendant's conduct caused or threatened the harm or evil
sought to be prevented by this section where defendant had been in possession
of complainant's confidential personal information since an unspecified time
when the two were neighbors and had used the information to attempt to avoid
arrest on two known occasions. Had defendant not been arrested, defendant
would have had a continuing opportunity to utilize complainant's confidential
personal information; accordingly, defendant's possession of complainant's
confidential personal information implicated the precise harm the legislature
sought to avoid in enacting this section. 129 H. 172, 297 P.3d 188 (2013).

Where the plain, obvious, and unambiguous meaning of this
section merely requires intentional or knowing unauthorized possession of
confidential personal information and there is no statutory language requiring that
the confidential personal information actually be used to impersonate another
person in order to constitute the offense, and to require "impersonation"
would be contrary to the legislature's manifest intent to criminalize mere
unauthorized possession, the circuit court erred in its construction of this
section. 125 H. 172 (App.), 254 P.3d 483 (2011).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next